Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5254.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-29.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-29.1 entitled "Pharmacy
Freedom of Choice — Fair Competition and Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-29.1-7. Regulation of pharmacy benefits managers.
(a) Pharmacy benefits managers shall be included within the definition of third-party
administrator under chapter 20.7 of this title and shall be regulated as such. The annual report filed
by third-party administrators with the department of business regulation shall include: contractual
language that provides a complete description of the financial arrangements between the third-party
administrator and each of the insurers covering benefit contracts delivered in Rhode Island; and if
the third-party administrator is owned by or affiliated with another entity or entities, it shall include
an organization chart and brief description that shows the relationships among all affiliates within
a holding company or otherwise affiliated. The reporting shall be in a format required by the
director and filed with the department as a public record as defined and regulated under chapter 2
of title 38.
(b) A pharmacy benefit manager may not reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist for a
prescription drug or pharmacy service in an amount less than the national average drug acquisition
cost for the prescription drug or pharmacy service at the time the drug is administered or dispensed,
plus a professional dispensing fee equal to the current Medicaid covered outpatient prescription
drug reimbursement dispensing fee for Rhode Island; provided that, if the national average drug

acquisition cost is not available at the time a drug is administered or dispensed, a pharmacy benefit
manager shall reimburse in an amount that is not less than the wholesale acquisition cost of the
drug, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), plus the professional dispensing set forth
herein. For purposes of this section, “National average drug acquisition cost” means the monthly
survey of retail pharmacies conducted by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to determine the average acquisition cost for Medicaid covered outpatient drugs.
(c) The office of the health insurance commissioner (OHIC) may enforce the provisions of
this chapter by imposing civil fines up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or by taking
any other enforcement actions not prohibited by law. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the
attorney general from also taking actions against pharmacy benefit managers to enforce any laws,
including provisions set forth in this section.
(d) Should any provision of this section be found unconstitutional, preempted, or otherwise
invalid, the remainder of this section, and the application of the provisions to persons or
circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected by that invalidity.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000623
========
LC000623 - Page 2 of 3